Idaho statutes. Title 48 MONOPOLIES AND TRADE PRACTICES
Chapter 4
UNFAIR SALES ACT

Sec.

§ 48-401. Title of act. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2018, ch. 179, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

§ 48-402. Declaration of policy and purpose. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2018, ch. 179, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

§ 48-403. Definitions of terms. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2018, ch. 179, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

§ 48-404. Advertising or sales at less than cost contrary to public policy. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2018, ch. 179, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

§ 48-405. Penalty for advertising or selling merchandise at less than cost. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2018, ch. 179, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

§ 48-405A. Limitation of quantity of items offered for sale at retail prohibited. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 146, § 1.

§ 48-406. Injunctions. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2018, ch. 179, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

§ 48-407. Exempted sales. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2018, ch. 179, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

§ 48-408. Supervision and administration of act by governor. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2018, ch. 179, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

§ 48-409. Witnesses

Exemption from prosecution based upon testimony. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2018, ch. 179, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

§ 48-410. Levy and collection of Idaho development and publicity fund tax

Appropriation and disbursements. [Repealed.]

S.L. 1978, ch. 181, § 1, effective on and after January 1, 1979.

§ 48-411. Separability. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2018, ch. 179, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

§ 48-412. Deceptive advertising as unfair competition. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2018, ch. 179, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

§ 48-413. Rebates unlawful. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2018, ch. 179, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.